pt-BR: Relevo topográfico: Alto-relevo; Suave; Outro
nb: Topografisk relieff: Hevet relieff; Glatt; Annet
ro-RO: Relieful topografic: Relief ridicat; Neted; Altele
hu: Topográfiai domborzat: Domborzat; Sima; Egyéb
zh-TW: 地形起伏: 加強緩解; 光滑; 其他
ko: 지형 돌출 표현: 돌출형 입형; 매끄러운; 기타
sv: Topografisk relief: upphöjd relief; Slät; Annat
ru: Топографический рельеф: Выпуклый; Гладкий; Другой
es: Relieve topográfico: Alivio elevado; Suave; Otros
vi: Phù điêu địa hình: Phù điêu nổi; Nhẵn; Khác
el: Ανάγλυφο τοπογραφίας: Ανάγλυφο; Ομαλό; Άλλο
hr-HR: Topografski reljef: Uzdignuti reljef; Glatka; Ostalo
nl: Topografisch reliëf: Reliëf; Glad; Overig
en: Topographical relief: Raised relief; Smooth; Other
ja: 地形の起伏: 浮彫; スムース; その他
sl-SI: Topografski relief: Izbočeni relief; Gladka; Druga
fi: Topografinen kohokuviointi: Kohokuvio; Sileä; Muu
de: Topografisches Relief: Erhabenes Relief; Glatt; Sonstiges
th: ลักษณะความสูงต่ำของภูมิประเทศ: บรรเทาปวด; เรียบ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Relevo topográfico: Relevo elevado; Suave; Outro
cs: Topografický reliéf: Plastický reliéf; Hladký reliéf; Jiné
bg-BG: Топографски релеф: Изпъкнал релеф; Гладко; Друго
pl: Rzeźba topograficzna: Wypukły relief; Gładkie; Inne
tr: Topografik kabartma: Kabartmalı; Düz; Diğer
lt-LT: Topografinis reljefas: Iškilus reljefas; Glotnus; Kita
it: Rilievo topografico: In rilievo; Liscio; Altro
fr: Relief topographique: Surélevé; Lisse; Autre
zh-CN: 地形起伏: 浮雕; 光滑; 其他
sk-SK: Topografický reliéf: Zvýšený reliéf; Hladký; Iné
da: Topografisk relief: Raised relief; Glat; Andet